Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 20 Graves and Corpses

11-20-1.
Disinterment of body.

Every person who shall, without proper authorization, disinter, dig up, remove, or carry away any human body from its place of sepulture, or who shall knowingly conceal any such body so disinterred or carried away, shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years or fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 281, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 347, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 399, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 610, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

11-20-1

; P.L. 1991, ch. 66, § 1.

11-20-1.1.
Mutilation of dead human bodies — Penalties — Exemptions.

Except as provided in this section, a person who dissects or mutilates a dead human body is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, or a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

This section does not apply to:

A physician or surgeon acting on the order of a court of competent jurisdiction, a coroner or other qualified officer, a licensed funeral director or a licensed embalmer;

Dissection to determine the cause of death when authorized by the nearest living kin of the deceased;

Unclaimed dead human bodies delivered by state or county authorities to regularly chartered institutions for scientific research;

The necessary mutilation incident to embalming a dead human body when authorized by nearest living kin, a court of competent jurisdiction or other qualified officer; or

Conduct authorized by the Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, chapter 18.6 of title 23.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 433, § 1.

11-20-1.2.
Necrophilia.

Any person who performs the act of first degree sexual assault upon a dead human body shall be guilty of the crime of necrophilia. Any person convicted of the crime of necrophilia shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than ten (10) years and may be fined in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 433, § 1.

11-20-2.
Desecration of grave.

Every person who shall willfully and maliciously destroy, mutilate, deface, cover over, injure or remove any tomb, monument, gravestone, American Flag, or other structure or thing placed or designed for a memorial of the dead, or any fence, railing, curb, or other thing intended for the protection or for the ornament of any tomb, monument, gravestone, or other structure of the like character and designed for that purposes, or of any enclosure for the sepulture of the dead, or dig or plow up, cultivate or build upon or within any enclosure or plot of ground used and occupied for the sepulture of the dead, or shall commit any nuisance in it, or wantonly disturb, remove, or in any way desecrate the contents of any grave in any enclosure or plot of ground, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned not less than one year and not exceeding three (3) years, and/or be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both and shall, in addition to imprisonment and/or fine, be ordered to make full restitution to any person, business or entity incurring the expense of repairing the grave.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 281, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 347, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 399, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 610, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

11-20-2

; P.L. 1976, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 375, § 1.

11-20-3.
Removal of marker on veteran’s grave.

Every person who maliciously or without authorization removes an American Flag in the vicinity of a veteran’s grave or from a flag staff in a cemetery shall be imprisoned not exceeding sixty (60) days or fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

Every person who shall, without right, remove from any grave a marker that was authorized to be placed by the cemetery to designate that the grave was the grave of a deceased veteran shall be imprisoned not exceeding one hundred and twenty (120) days or fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) for a first offense, and shall be imprisoned not exceeding one hundred and twenty (120) days or fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) for a second offense.

Every person, firm, partnership or corporation who shall purchase, sell or destroy any veteran’s grave marker shall be subject to the same penalties provided in subsection (b) of this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 46; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 49; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 49; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 49; G.L. 1956, §

11-20-3

; P.L. 1982, ch. 219, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 6.